Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Competitive Cable and Video Services Act
7-59-309. Notice of authorized and activated public, educational, and governmental access channels — Additional channels — Operation and content — Access support fees.

A county or municipality shall, within ten (10) days following the receipt of an application for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority from a cable or video service provider seeking approval to provide cable or video service to the county or municipality, provide notice to the department regarding the number of public, educational, and governmental access channels, “PEG” channels, that have been activated and are authorized to be activated and the amount of any fee or other payment for PEG access support required under the terms of the franchise agreement with the incumbent cable service provider with the most subscribers in the municipality or county on January 1, 2008, whether or not the agreement has expired.

For purposes of this section, a PEG channel is deemed activated if it is being utilized for PEG programming within the municipality or county.

For purposes of this section, “PEG programming” means noncommercial local interest programming that may include meetings of local governing bodies, boards and commissions, community events, community sporting events, community school programs, arts programs, educational programming provided by departments or agencies of the federal or state government, cultural and history programs, classroom and instructional programs, community news and information programs, programs for children and seniors, or other similar programs.

If a municipality or county has provided the notice required under subsection (a), then within ninety (90) days after beginning to offer cable or video service for purchase in a municipality or county, or, in the case such notice has not occurred, within ninety (90) days after the date the notice occurs, a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall designate the same number of PEG channels for PEG programming that a municipality or county has activated as described in the notice provided pursuant to subsection (a). If access to PEG facilities or appropriate PEG personnel is not reasonably available to the holder during the ninety-day period, the period shall be extended proportionately day for day for up to ninety (90) additional days unless the party controlling access to the facility where the PEG programming is produced unreasonably denies the provider with access to the facility. The channels shall be provided notwithstanding whether the applicable incumbent cable service provider has terminated its franchise in favor of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority and no interruption in PEG programming distribution shall occur as a result of the termination.

In the event a municipality or county has not utilized the maximum number of PEG channels as described in the notice provided pursuant to subsection (a), access to the additional channel or channels shall be provided upon one hundred twenty (120) days' request to the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority or incumbent cable service provider. PEG channels shall be subject to the utilization standards contained in the unexpired franchise until the expiration date of the franchise even if terminated for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority. In all cases following the expiration date of existing franchises, “substantial utilization” shall be determined as follows:

For the first PEG channel activated on a system, eight (8) hours of PEG programming per day is programmed on average for each calendar quarter, which programming may include character-generated programming that is not outdated and is of interest to the local community; and

For each additional activated PEG channel, ten (10) hours of PEG programming per business day, other than character-generated programming, is programmed for each calendar quarter.

For purposes of measuring compliance with the minimum programming per day as provided in this subsection (c), the broadcast of any one (1) program in excess of two (2) times within any twenty-four-hour period or in excess of six (6) times in a business week shall not count toward the minimum requirement. An incumbent cable service provider or holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority may give notice of its intent to recover for its own use any PEG channel that is not substantially utilized; provided, that, if within ninety (90) days of the giving of the notice the county or municipality begins substantially utilizing the PEG channel, it shall remain a PEG channel. If at the end of such period the channel is not being substantially utilized, the incumbent cable service provider or holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority may recover the channel for its own use.

After July 1, 2008, the maximum number of PEG channels to which a municipality or county has access with regard to a cable or video service provider shall be the number, if any, provided for in any local franchise agreement in effect as of January 1, 2008, notwithstanding the subsequent expiration of the agreement or termination of the agreement for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority.

If a municipality or county did not have PEG channels under the incumbent cable service provider's franchise agreement as of July 1, 2008, the cable or video service provider shall designate upon written request a sufficient amount of capacity on its cable system or video service network to support up to three (3) PEG channels for a municipality or county with a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or more households; up to two (2) PEG channels for a municipality or county with less than fifty thousand (50,000) but not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) households; and one (1) PEG channel for a municipality or county with less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) households. If a provider serves more than one (1) municipality or county from a single headend, then the number of households served over the entire system shall be aggregated for purposes of calculating the maximum number of channels that must be provided over the system under this subsection (e). The municipalities or counties served over a system shall determine how the channel or channels provided will be shared. To qualify for the first PEG channel on a system under this subsection (e), a municipality or county shall affirm its intent to substantially utilize the channel as provided for in this subsection (e). With regard to the first PEG channel, the substantial utilization standard shall not be reviewed until nine (9) months after the channel is activated by the municipality or county. Where one (1) or more PEG channels are authorized over a system, an additional channel, up to the maximum number of PEG channels allowed under this subsection (e), may be requested upon a showing that existing PEG channel or channels are being substantially utilized as provided for in this subsection (e).

The operation and content of any PEG channel provided pursuant to this section shall be the responsibility of the municipality or the county receiving the benefit of the channel and the cable or video service provider bears only the responsibility for the transmission of the channel. A holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority must transmit a PEG channel by one (1) of the following methods:

Interconnection, which may be accomplished by direct cable, microwave link, satellite or other method of connection. Upon request, if technically feasible, an incumbent cable service provider must interconnect its network for the provision of PEG programming with a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority. The terms of the interconnection shall be as mutually agreed and shall require the requesting holder to pay the reasonable costs of establishing the interconnection. It is declared to be the legislative intent that an incumbent cable service provider should not incur any additional cost as a result of an interconnection required pursuant to this subdivision (f)(1)(A). In the event a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority and the incumbent cable service provider cannot agree upon the terms under which the interconnection is to be made or the costs of the interconnection, either party may request the department to determine the terms under which the interconnection shall be made and the costs of the interconnection. The determination of the department shall be final. Upon notice to the governing authority of the county or municipality, the time for the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority to begin providing PEG programming as required in this section shall be tolled during the time the department is making its determination; or

Transmission of the signal from each PEG channel programmer's local origination point, at the holder's expense, such expense to include any equipment necessary for the holder to transmit the signal from PEG channels activated as of July 1, 2008, if the origination point is in the holder's service area.

All PEG channel programming provided to a cable or video service provider for transmission must meet the federal national television system committee standards or the advanced television committee standards. If a PEG channel programmer complies with these standards and the holder does not provide transmission of the programming without altering the transmission signal, then the holder must do one (1) of the following:

Alter the transmission signal to make it compatible with the technology or protocol the holder uses to deliver its service; or

Provide to the municipality or county, at the holder's expense, in the case of PEG channels activated as of July 1, 2008, the equipment needed to accomplish such alteration.

If accessibility to PEG programming or a subscriber's ability to utilize PEG programming transmitted by a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority is materially different than that provided by an incumbent cable provider, then the holder shall make available a description of the differences on a publicly accessible web site and within the holder's marketing materials and customer service agreements.

The provision of PEG content to the provider shall constitute authorization for the provider to carry the content, including, at the provider's option, beyond the jurisdictional boundaries of the municipality or county; provided, that the municipality or county can acquire the rights at no additional cost. If the municipality or county cannot acquire the rights, then the municipality or county shall be responsible for not transmitting the content to any provider that is unable to restrict the content to a jurisdictional boundary.

All PEG channels provided by either an incumbent cable or video service provider or by a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority may be provided in a digital format at the provider's or holder's option; provided, that the availability to subscribers of the PEG programming provided by an incumbent cable provider or a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall be in accordance with the terms of any applicable local franchise agreement, except as provided in this section.

PEG channels may be provided as follows:

If, as of July 1, 2008, a county or municipality has activated more than three (3) channels:

One (1) such channel may, upon one hundred twenty (120) days' notice to the county or municipality, be moved to any tier of service to which at least fifty percent (50%) of the subscribers served by the cable or video service provider in the area served by the PEG channel actually subscribe;

Municipalities and counties shall be eligible for state-authorized PEG access support fees as follows:

A holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall, immediately upon beginning to offer cable or video service for purchase in a municipality or county, be required to make state-authorized PEG access support payments that are equivalent to any PEG access support payments required to be made by the incumbent cable service provider in accordance with the notice required by subsection (a). The obligation shall continue until the natural expiration date of the incumbent cable service provider's local franchise that was in existence as of January 1, 2008, or, in the case of a local franchise that has expired but the terms of which are still in effect, until a new local franchise agreement or a state-issued certificate of franchise authority for the provider becomes effective, referred to in this section as the initial PEG support period. The payment obligation shall be as follows:

If the incumbent cable service provider provides PEG access support in the form of periodic payments to the municipal or county governing authority that are equal to a percentage of gross revenue or a specified per-subscriber amount, the holder of a state-issued franchise shall make state-authorized PEG support payments to the governing authority equal to the same percentage of gross revenue or per-subscriber amount; or

If the incumbent cable service provider provides PEG access support to the municipal or county governing authority in the form of a lump-sum payment or a series of fixed payments, then to the extent that the incumbent cable service provider's obligation to make the payments remains unsatisfied as of January 1, 2008, the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall pay to the municipality or county a state-authorized PEG support payment amount equal to the portion of the incumbent cable service provider's remaining obligation due during the calendar year multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the total number of the holder's subscribers in the municipality or county thirty (30) days prior to the payment due date and the denominator of which is the total number of cable service and video service subscribers of all providers of cable and video service in the municipality or county as of the same date.

Following the initial PEG support period, a municipality or county that had received initial PEG access support shall, upon written notification to all cable and video service providers serving the municipality or county, be entitled to continue to receive state-authorized PEG access support equal to the same percentage of gross revenues, not to exceed one percent (1%), as it was receiving at the end of the initial PEG support period; provided, however, that no municipality or county shall receive less on a per subscriber basis than it received from the initial PEG support payments. If such a municipality or county is receiving state-authorized PEG support in an amount that is less than one percent (1%), then a municipality or county may, pursuant to a duly adopted ordinance or resolution, increase its state-authorized PEG support to an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of gross revenue for the sole purposes of paying any category of costs that were being covered by initial PEG support payments. The right of a municipality or county to require a state-authorized PEG support payment following the initial PEG support period under this subsection (j) is discretionary with the municipality or county and nothing shall prohibit a reduction of the payments.

A municipality or county not receiving initial PEG support payments, may, pursuant to a duly adopted ordinance or resolution, require that a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority pay state-authorized PEG support payments to the county or municipality in an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of gross revenue, for the sole purpose of paying capital costs of equipment in connection with the operation of PEG channels; provided, that the aggregate amount of state-authorized PEG support payments pursuant to this subdivision (j)(3) together with any franchise fees required to be paid under § 7-59-306 shall not exceed five percent (5%) of gross revenues.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part or state law to the contrary, amounts received by a municipality or county for PEG support may not be used for other purposes.

All payments due under this section shall be remitted with the franchise fee payment, and the administrative provisions of § 7-59-306 and the definitions of § 7-59-303 shall apply.

All cable and video service providers may designate that portion of the subscriber's bill attributable to any payment required under this section as a separate item on the bill and recover the amount from the subscriber.

Notwithstanding § 7-59-307(c), an incumbent cable service provider that provides free cable service to schools or government offices in a municipality or county on July 1, 2008, shall be required to continue to provide the free service to those locations until the natural termination date of the local franchise agreement; provided, that the municipality or county provides the incumbent with a list of locations where the free service is provided as of July 1, 2008. Any other cable or video service provider or holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority that serves the same municipality or county as an incumbent cable service provider that is offering free cable service as provided for in this subsection (k) shall provide a comparable level of free cable or video service to the same locations as listed by the municipality or county until the natural termination date of the incumbent's local franchise agreement.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (k)(1), all cable or video service providers providing cable or video services in a municipality or county, including all holders of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority providing services under the state-issued certificate, and the municipality or county are authorized to negotiate any other arrangement agreed to by all parties other than meeting the requirements of subdivision (k)(1).

Not earlier than two (2) years following July 1, 2008, an additional channel may be moved as provided in subdivision (h)(2)(A)(i); and

Not earlier than three (3) years after July 1, 2008, one (1) additional channel may be moved as provided in subdivision (h)(2)(A)(i);

If, as of July 1, 2008, a county or municipality has activated three (3) channels:

One (1) such channel may, upon one hundred twenty (120) days' notice to the county or municipality, be moved to any tier of service to which at least fifty percent (50%) of the subscribers served by the cable or video service provider in the area served by the PEG channel actually subscribe; and

Not earlier than two (2) years following July 1, 2008, an additional channel may be moved as provided in subdivision (h)(2)(B)(i);

If, as of July 1, 2008, a county or municipality has activated two (2) channels, one (1) such channel may, upon one hundred twenty (120) days' notice to the county or municipality, be moved to any tier of service to which at least fifty percent (50%) of the subscribers served by the cable or video service provider in the area served by the PEG channel actually subscribe; or

Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, up to three (3) PEG channels of a municipality or county may, upon one hundred twenty (120) days' notice to the county or municipality, be provided on any tier of service if the channels are available to subscribers that only subscribe to a cable or video service provider's lowest cost tier. If additional equipment is required for such a subscriber to have access to the PEG channels provided on the tier of service, then the monthly cost for the equipment shall not exceed the greater of three dollars ($3.00), adjusted annually to reflect inflation commencing after the effective date in accordance with the consumer price index, or ten percent (10%) of the cost of the tier. The cable or video service provider may seek a waiver from the department of the foregoing price limitation if it can show that under the circumstances, the limitation is unreasonable. In addition to the PEG channel relocation rights under subdivisions (h)(2)(A), (B) and (C), following October 1, 2009, to the extent that a provider makes at least three (3) PEG channels available to subscribers as described in this subdivision (h)(2)(D), then upon at least sixty (60) days' notice to the county or municipality, any additional PEG channels may be moved to any tier of service to which at least fifty percent (50%) of the subscribers served by the cable or video service provider in the area served by the PEG channel actually subscribe.

Any PEG channels activated after April 1, 2008, may be provided on any tier of service to which at least fifty percent (50%) of the subscribers served by the cable or video service provider in the area served by the PEG channel actually subscribe.

The determination as to whether a particular PEG channel or channels are to be moved pursuant to this subsection (h) shall be subject to the approval of the governing authority of the affected county or municipality.

A holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority is not required to interconnect for or otherwise transmit PEG content that is branded with the logo, name, or other identifying marks of another cable or video service provider.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-59-310. Effect of part on powers of municipalities relative to installation of cable facilities — Notice to cable providers of availability of open trenching — Use of conduits.

Nothing in this part precludes the exercise of police powers by municipalities or counties, including the adoption and enforcement of any proper ordinances or resolutions not in conflict with this part.

Nothing in this part diminishes or derogates from the ordinances or resolutions duly adopted by the governing body of a municipality or county and applicable to occupants or users of the public rights-of-way.

Cable and video service providers must abide by the rights-of-way ordinances and resolutions of the municipality or county of general applicability in which the service is provided as well as any applicable state laws or rules.

Nothing in this part diminishes or derogates from the existing powers promoting the health, safety and welfare of a community and its citizens, including the authority to regulate, during the permitting process, the installation and placement of video or cable facilities for the purpose of addressing the aesthetic concerns of the community.

Notwithstanding any provision in this part to the contrary, in cases of new construction or property development where utilities are to be placed underground, each municipality, county or other relevant permitting authority shall establish as a condition to issuing each permit for open trenching to any developer or property owner that the developer or property owner give all providers of cable or video service serving the applicable municipality or county at least sixty (60) days' prior notice of the construction or development, and of the particular dates on which open trenching will be available for the providers' installation of conduit, pedestals or vaults, and laterals, referred to in this subsection (b) as equipment, to be provided at each such provider's expense.

In the event a developer or property owner fails to give the required notice, the developer or property owner shall be responsible for the cost of new trenching for the installation of the cable or video service provider's equipment.

Each provider shall also provide specifications as needed for trenching. Costs of trenching and easements required to bring service to the development shall be borne by the developer or property owner; except that, if any cable or video service provider fails to install its equipment within the dates during which the trenches are scheduled to be open, as designated in the notice given by the developer or property owner, then should the trenches be closed after such time period, the cost of new trenching is to be borne by the cable or video service provider.

In the event the relevant permitting rules of a municipality, county or other relevant permitting authority require less than sixty (60) days' advance notice to all providers of cable or video service providers service, then the required notice shall be the lesser of sixty (60) days or the number of days prior to construction that the relevant rules require for the advance notice, but in no event less than ten (10) days. If a municipality, county or other relevant permitting authority's rules do not specify any minimum advance notice of construction requirements, then the required notice shall be sixty (60) days.

The grant of authority provided holders of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority pursuant to § 7-59-305(e) does not expressly or implicitly authorize such a holder to use publicly or privately owned conduits without a separate agreement with the owners of the conduits.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 11.

7-59-311. Prohibited discrimination — Low-income households — Affirmative defenses — Measuring compliance — Waiver or extension.

A holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall not discriminate among residential subscribers or potential subscribers. For purposes of this section, “discrimination” means the denial of access to cable or video service to any individual or group of residential subscribers or potential subscribers because of the race, income, gender, or ethnicity of the residents in the local area in which the individual or group resides.

Within forty-two (42) months after the date it receives a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, twenty-five percent (25%) of the households with access to a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority's cable or video service shall be low-income households. Compliance with this requirement shall be an affirmative defense to any allegations of discrimination pursuant to subdivision (a)(1). With respect to an incumbent cable service provider that obtains a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the affirmative obligation to provide access to low-income households as specified in this subsection (a) shall be measured based upon the percentage of low-income households that exist only in new areas that are not covered, or were not previously covered, by a local franchise, referred to in this section as the new areas. An incumbent cable service provider that obtains a state-issued certificate of franchise authority will be deemed to satisfy its affirmative obligation if the provider certifies to the department in its application for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority that it will deploy its cable or video system to all the households located within the proposed service area. An incumbent cable service provider that obtains a state-issued certificate of franchise authority and satisfies its affirmative obligation as provided for in this subsection (a) shall have an affirmative defense to an allegation of discrimination pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) with respect to new areas. With respect to areas served under a state-issued certificate of franchise authority by such a holder other than new areas, the holder shall have an affirmative defense to a subdivision (a)(1) complaint with respect to any municipality or county to the extent that the holder can establish that twenty-five percent (25%) of the households with access to its cable or video service in the applicable municipality or county are low-income households.

After the forty-two (42) months has elapsed, except as provided in this subdivision (a)(3), all holders of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall prepare an annual report on the estimated percentage of low-income households with access to its service. This report shall contain information demonstrating the estimated percentage share of low-income households with access to its video or cable service compared with the total number of all customers with access to its video or cable service anywhere within the area served under its state-issued certificate of franchise authority. The report need not be broken out into percentages based on geographic subdivisions, counties, or municipalities. The report shall be provided to all counties and municipalities in which the provider offers video or cable service and to the department. With respect to incumbent cable providers that obtain a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, no annual report shall be required with respect to any service areas that are, or have been subject to, a local franchise. To the extent that such a holder expands cable or video service to new areas pursuant to a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the incumbent shall file the annual report limited to the new areas. In cases involving new areas where the annual report is required for the holders, if the holder certifies in its application to the department that it will provide cable or video service to all homes within the proposed new area that have at least a density of twenty (20) homes per mile measured from the holder's existing distribution plant, then no additional reports shall be required with respect to such areas.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall provide access to its cable or video service, or to broadband Internet service as provided in subsection (d), to a number of households equal to at least thirty percent (30%) of the households in its franchise area within forty-two (42) months after the date it receives a state-issued certificate of franchise authority. With respect to incumbent cable service providers that obtain a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the deployment thresholds provided for in this subsection (b) shall not be measured with respect to any service areas that are, or have been, subject to the provisions of a local franchise. To the extent that such a holder expands cable or video service to new areas pursuant to a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the deployment thresholds shall apply to the new areas only.

For purposes of determining whether a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority has violated subsection (a) or (b), a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority may satisfy the requirements of this section through the use of alternate technology, except for direct-to-home satellite service or direct broadcast satellite service, that offers service, functionality, and content that is demonstrably similar to that provided through the holder's video service network and may include a technology that does not require the use of any public rights-of-way or other alternative technology that, in the opinion of the department, is sufficiently similar to satisfy the obligations of this section. The technology utilized to comply with the requirements of this section shall include local public, education and government channels and messages over the emergency alert system as required by this part.

For purposes of calculating whether a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority has met the requirements of subsection (b), each household to which the holder provides access to broadband Internet service that did not have access to such service from the holder prior to the date of application to the department for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, shall count as two (2) households for measurement purposes. A household to which the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority provides access to broadband Internet service that did not have broadband Internet access from any provider prior to the date of application to the department for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, shall count as four (4) households for measurement purposes.

It is the legislative intent that in measuring compliance with this section, the department may rely upon verification provided by Connected Tennessee, as to the expansion of access to broadband Internet service to households by a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority.

To qualify for any broadband Internet service credit provided for in this section, a holder must have submitted to the verifier on the date of its application for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority a base line report identifying all zip codes in the state where the holder provides broadband Internet service to all households. If the holder provides broadband Internet service to fewer than all households in a zip code the holder shall identify the geographic area within the zip code where broadband Internet service is provided. The base line report shall be certified as true and correct by an officer of the holder. In providing a recommendation to the department as to whether a credit should be provided to a holder, the verifier shall provide the department with an explanation on what basis a credit should be provided supported by a sworn certification by an officer of the verifier that the holder is eligible for the specific credit that is recommended. The attorney general and reporter shall have the authority upon reasonable cause to investigate the request for or award of any credit under this section. Upon such an investigation, the attorney general and reporter shall have access to all information relied upon by the verifier with regard to the application for or award of a credit under this part.

For the purposes of this subsection (d), households to which a holder extends access to broadband Internet service as described in this section shall be counted toward the deployment requirements of subsection (b), notwithstanding that the households may or may not have access to cable or video services from the holder. Any information submitted to, or obtained by the verifier or attorney general and reporter pursuant to this subsection (d) shall be considered proprietary information and therefore is confidential and not subject to the open records laws, compiled in title 10, chapter 7.

A holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority may apply to the department for a waiver of or an extension of time to meet the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) or for an extension of time for deployment as set forth in § 7-59-305(c)(3) if one (1) or more of the following conditions materially impaired the ability of the holder to meet the requirements:

The inability to obtain access to public and private rights-of-way under reasonable terms and conditions;

Developments or buildings not being subject to competition because of existing exclusive service arrangements;

Developments or buildings being inaccessible using reasonable technical solutions under commercially reasonable terms and conditions;

Natural disasters; or

Factors beyond the control of the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority.

The department may grant the waiver or extension only if the holder has made substantial and continuous effort to meet the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) or of § 7-59-305(c)(3). If an extension is granted, the department shall establish a new compliance deadline. Absent a complaint brought as provided in § 7-59-312, the department is not authorized to make any determination regarding a provider's compliance with this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall not be obligated to provide service outside the holder's franchise area; provided, however, that a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority that is a large telecommunications provider shall not be obligated to provide service to customers within its franchise area for whom the holder does not offer wireline broadband Internet service.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority shall not be required to comply with, and no entity may impose or enforce, any mandatory build-out or deployment provisions, schedules, or requirements except as required by this section.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 12; 2013, ch. 204, § 4.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.